Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8264.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6-13 of the General Laws entitled "Unfair Sales Practices" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
6-13-12.2. Money received for gift certificates.
(a) Any money, payment, or other monetary consideration received by any person, firm or
corporation who or that sells any gift certificate for any product or merchandise sold by the person,
firm or corporation, hereinafter referred to as a “retailer,” shall place the funds or consideration
received for the gift certificate in a separate account. Funds shall be held in this separate account
until the gift certificate is used or redeemed. Upon redemption of the gift certificate, in whole or in
part, the funds in the separate account may be transferred to the retailer’s business account or such
other account as where the retailer keeps funds collected in the usual course of the retailer’s
business, in an amount equal to the amount of the gift certificate which has been redeemed.
Provided, a gift certificate that is distributed to a consumer pursuant to a rewards, loyalty, or
promotional program without any money or other thing of value being given in exchange for the
gift certificate by the consumer, shall be exempt from the provisions of this section.
(b) As used herein, the term “retailer” shall have the same meaning as defined in § 6-13-
12.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005990
========
LC005990 - Page 2 of 3